Mississippi, session 2026, HB175.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: WHEREAS, each year, thousands of high school students across the State of Mississippi complete the school year without summer employment or meaningful and productive ways to spend their time, which often creates boredom that may lead to mischief or even criminal activity by youth; and WHEREAS, at the same time, the communities in which our young adults live have countless opportunities to engage the youth in meaningful work through which they can learn to be responsible, develop good character and a sense of self-worth, and gain valuable workforce experience while having a safe, productive way to spend their summer months and earn income; and WHEREAS, just a few of the many job possibilities often available through municipal and county agencies and nonprofit entities are:  assisting with children's activities offered by little league sports programs or day camps; seasonal work in local parks and recreation facilities; and temporary positions available in local hospitals, schools with summer programs and other nonprofit entities serving the public; and WHEREAS, it is the intent of the Legislature, in passing this act, to encourage communities across the state to develop programs that can bridge unemployed high school students with opportunities for meaningful summer employment, thereby positively impacting the individual lives of those young persons who participate in the program as well as the quality of life of the entire communities themselves; NOW, THEREFORE, BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. (1)  The board of supervisors of any county, in its discretion, and the governing authority of any municipality, in its discretion, may establish a summer youth work program for the purpose of facilitating the employment of eligible high school students in temporary seasonal jobs that have a positive impact on the local community. (2)  A board of supervisors of a county or the governing authority of a municipality that establishes a summer youth work program under this section shall prepare a list of all jobs available to students through the program with the county or municipality.  In compiling the list, the board of supervisors of a county or the governing authority of a municipality, as the case may be, shall solicit information relating to any jobs that may be available through local nonprofit organizations in order to also include those employment opportunities on the list.  The list of summer youth work program jobs must be provided to each public and private high school in the community before March 1 of each year. In addition, the board of supervisors of a county or the governing authority of a municipality, as the case may be, shall publish the list of available jobs on its website, which must be kept up-to-date with new job postings and the status of jobs no longer available when those positions are filled.  The list of jobs must include detailed job descriptions that provide no less than the following information for each position:  the start and end dates; a description of the nature of the work and duties and expectations of summer employees; the required hours; the salary, which must be no less than the minimum wage rate; any special physical requirements or restrictions; and any other information pertinent to a particular job. (3)  In order to be eligible for a job through a summer youth work program, a student must be no less than sixteen (16) years of age nor more than nineteen (19) years of age.  The student may not have graduated from high school yet and may not have any criminal convictions or criminal charges pending other than minor traffic violations.  Upon receiving an application to participate in the work program from a student, the board of supervisors of the county or the governing authority of the municipality shall assess the student's age, interests and work-readiness to determine the most appropriate job available for that student.  If, in any year, there are more applicants than available positions, the board of supervisors of the county or the governing authority of the municipality, as the case may be, shall prioritize placing students who are members of households demonstrating the greatest financial need. (4)  Each youth selected to participate in the summer youth work program must present a letter from the student's parent or legal guardian granting consent for the child to work.  The student and parent or legal guardian also must sign a waiver of liability releasing the board of supervisors of the county or the governing authority of the municipality, as the case may be, or any nonprofit agency employing a student from any liability that may arise from the student's work. (5)  A board of supervisors of a county or a governing authority of a municipality establishing a summer youth work program may accept any funding, public or private, that may be made available for the administration of the program and costs of the student employees' wages.  Subject to the availability of funding for such purpose, the governmental entity may award grants to nonprofit entities providing jobs through the work program to cover the wages of students hired for those positions.  Counties and municipalities establishing summer youth work programs are encouraged to apply for available funding from state and federal grant programs as well as private sources. (6)  A board of supervisors of a county or a governing authority of a municipality establishing a summer youth work program may enter into an agreement with another organization for the administration of the program. SECTION 2.  Section 1 of this act shall be codified in Chapter 25, Title 17, Mississippi Code of 1972. SECTION 3.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.